Utah statutes.
41-22-10.   Powers of board relating to off-highway vehicles.

(1)  The board may:

(a)  appoint and seek recommendations from the Off-highway Vehicle Advisory Council representing the various off-highway vehicle, conservation, and other appropriate interests; and

(b)  adopt a uniform marker and sign system for use by agents of appropriate federal, state, county, and city agencies in areas of off-highway vehicle use.

(2)  The board shall receive and distribute voluntary contributions collected under Section 41-1a-230.6 in accordance with Section 41-22-19.5.

